src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_МАРАҢГЫ-SG
 SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;

LEXICON NMN_МАРАҢГЫ-PL
  PLNOMSUF ;
:%^A2I PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;





 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;


LEXICON N_ЯЙ
! мея:мея
: NMN_ЯЙ ;

LEXICON NMN_ЯЙ
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGDATSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 SGTRASUF ;

 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;


LEXICON N_СЕЛВ
! мея:мея
: NMN_СЕЛВ ;

LEXICON NMN_СЕЛВ
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGDATSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 SGTRASUF ;

 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

!LEXICON N-nAI
! SGNOMSUF ;
! SGACCSUF ;
! SGGENSUF ;
! SGDATSUF ;
! SGLOCSUF ;
! SGABLSUF ;
! SGPROSSUF ;
! SGTRASUF ;
!
! DUNOMSUF ;
! DUACCSUF ;
! DUGENSUF ;
!
! PLNOMSUF ;
! PLACCSUF_I ; !
! PLGENSUF_I ; !
! PLDATSUF ;
! PLLOCSUF ;
! PLABLSUF ;
! PLPROSSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;



 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON N_ИБЯ
!ибя:ибя
: NMN_ИБЯ ;
LEXICON NMN_ИБЯ
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGDATSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 SGTRASUF ;

 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON N_ТАСО !! таˮ:та
!: NMN_ТАСО ;
:С1 NMN_МУНО ;
:С1о MUNO_O ;

LEXICON NMN_ТАСО
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGDATSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 SGTRASUF ;

 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON N_Cons
+WORK: SGNOMSUF ;

LEXICON N_ConsO
!вык:вык
+WORK: SGNOMSUF ;


LEXICON N_ВАР
!! варˮ:вар
!! Yaml: __N-tarTS__
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Дваˮ ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дмда ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
! +Equ, +Equ+Lat
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
! +Du{+Acc|+Gen|+Nom}
! +Pl+Dat, +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScDu3, +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3
! +Pl+Dat+PxSg{1|2}
! +Sg+Dat{+PxSg{1|2|3}|+PxDu{2|3}|+PxPl{2|3}}
! +Pl+Abl; +Sg+Abl
! +Sg+Acc+PxSg2
! +Sg+Gen{+PxPl1|+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg|+PxSg2}
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кна ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-SG-PROS_Vмна ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
! +Sg+Acc{+PxDu1|+PxPl1}
! +Sg+Gen+PxDu1
! +Sg+Nom{PxDu1||PxDu3|+PxPl1|+PxPl3|+PxSg3}
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+{+Aor|+Prt1}+Sc{Du|Pl}{1|2}
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+Sc{Sg1|Sg2}
! +Sg+Nom{X}+Der/Cop+Ind{Y}+ScSg3
! {X}= +PxSg3, +PxDu1, +PxDu3, +PxPl1, +PxPl3 
! {Y}= +Aor, +Prt1
! +Tra
:е NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;




!Work required
LEXICON N_ТЭНО 
: SGNOMSUF ;
: SGACCSUF ;
: SGGENSUF ;
: SGDATSUF ;
: SGLOCSUF ;
: SGABLSUF ;
: SGPROSSUF ; 
: SGTRASUF ;

: DUNOMSUF ;
: DUACCSUF ;
: DUGENSUF ;

: PLNOMSUF ;
: PLACCSUF ;
: PLDATSUF ;
: PLLOCSUF ;
: PLABLSUF ;
!: PLTRASUF ;

: POSSESSOR-INDICES ; ! 
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON N-tojo
+WORK: K ;


LEXICON N-xawo
: SGNOMSUF ;
:д SGACCSUF ;
:д SGGENSUF ;
:ˮ SGDATSUF ;
:ˮ SGLOCSUF ;
:ˮ SGABLSUF ;
:ˮ SGPROSSUF ;
: SGTRASUF ;

: DUNOMSUF ;
: DUACCSUF ;
: DUGENSUF ;

:д PLNOMSUF ;
:д PLACCSUF ;
: PLDATSUF ;
:ˮ PLLOCSUF ;
:ˮ PLABLSUF ;
!: PLTRASUF ;

+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;
: POSSESSOR-INDICES ; !


LEXICON N-якэ
 N_ПАНЫ ;

LEXICON N-N
: SGNOMSUF ;
: SGACCSUF ;

!! The singular accusative stem
LEXICON SG-ACC-STEM
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;

!LEXICON SG-DAT-STEM
LEXICON SG-NOM-STEM
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
! SGPROSSUF ;
 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;
+Pred+Abs:%>д K ;
PRED-POSSESSA ; ! This is perhaps a derivation
+Car:%>сиˮ K ;
+Equ:%>даремʼ K ; !дремʼ for non-even-syllable stems
+Equ+Lat:%>даревʼ K ; !древʼ for non-even-syllable stems
+Tra:%>ңэ K ;

LEXICON SGTRASUF ! Not needed any more!
K ;

LEXICON SGNOMSUF
+Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON SGACCSUF
+Sg+Acc:%>мʼ K ;

LEXICON SGGENSUF
+Sg+Gen:%>ʼ K ;

LEXICON SGDATSUF
+Sg+Dat:%>нʼ K ;

LEXICON SGLOCSUF
+Sg+Loc:%>х%{ауоэØ%}на K ; !вэсакохона пэдарахана ңамгэхэна

LEXICON SGLOCSUF_Хна !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мякна
+Sg+Loc:%>хна K ;

LEXICON SGLOCSUF_Хана !!≈ * __@CODE@__ серкана
+Sg+Loc:%>хана K ;

LEXICON SGABLSUF
+Sg+Abl:%>х%{ауоэØ%}д K ; !вэсакоход пэдарахад ңамгэхэд

LEXICON SGPROSSUF
!+Sg+Pros:%>%{увм%}А2на K ; 
+Sg+Pros:%>%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}А2н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-28

LEXICON SGPROSSUF_АМНА
!+Sg+Pros:%>амна K ;
+Sg+Pros:%>%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}А2н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-28
 POSSESSA-SG-PROS_АМНА ;

! These must be checked
LEXICON DUNOMSUF 
+Du+Nom:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ʼ K ;
!+Du+Nom:%>хʼ K ;

LEXICON DUACCSUF
+Du+Acc:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ʼ K ;
!+Du+Acc:%>хʼ K ;

LEXICON DUGENSUF 
+Du+Gen:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ʼ K ;
!+Du+Gen:%>хʼ K ;

!! Start Plural
LEXICON PLNOMSUF
+Pl+Nom:%>ˮ K ;
! PLTRASUF ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF
+Pl+Acc:%>Ы1 K ; ! We need something to trigger а:и 0:о but retain ы:ы
+Pl+Acc:%>Ы1 PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_Minus
:%^VowLoss PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_Zero
! This has zero ending
!+Pl+Acc: K ;
 PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_I
+Pl+Acc:%>и  K ; !Stem final е а я may change to и.
:%>и PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_Е
+Pl+Acc:%>е K ;
:%>е PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_Ё
+Pl+Acc:%>ё K ;
:%>ё PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_О
!+Pl+Acc:%>о  K ; 
:%>о PL-ACC_STEM ;


!LEXICON PLACCSUF_AO
!+Pl+Acc:  K ; ! The rule "a:o in я" This will be pointed to PLACCSUF_Zero

!! What is assumed on the basis of the plural accusative
LEXICON PL-ACC_STEM
+Pl+Acc:	K	;
+Pl+Gen:%>ˮ	K	;
+Pl+Pros:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2на 	K	; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ When does this take a vowel хоˮомна

 POSSESSA-PL-NOM ;
+Pl+Acc: POSSESSA-PL-ACC ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ˮ POSSESSA-PL-GEN ;
  POSSESSA-PL-PROS ;
!2013-04-22!+Pl+Pros:ˮмана  POSSESSA-PL-PROS ;



!LEXICON PLGENSUF
!+Pl+Gen:%>Ы1ˮ PL-ACC_STEM ;

!LEXICON PLGENSUF_Glot
!+Pl+Gen:%>ˮ PL-ACC_STEM ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>ˮ K ; 

!LEXICON PLGENSUF_I
!+Pl+Gen:%>и  K ; !Stem final е а я may change to и.

!LEXICON PLGENSUF_О
!+Pl+Gen:%>оˮ PL-ACC_STEM ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>оˮ K ;

!LEXICON PLGENSUF_AO
!+Pl+Acc:%>ё  K ; ! This is not suffix, it should replace stem я. Exception list?

LEXICON PLDATSUF
+Pl+Dat:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ˮ K ;
+Pl+Dat:%>хˮ K ;

LEXICON PLLOCSUF
+Pl+Loc:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ˮна K ;

LEXICON PLABLSUF
+Pl+Abl:%>х%{ауоэØ%}т K ;


LEXICON PLPROSSUF
!+Pl+Pros:%>Ы1ˮмана K ;
+Pl+Pros:%>ˮмна K ;
!+Pl+Pros:%>ˮмана PL-PROS_POSSESSA ;
!+Pl+Pros:%>ˮмна K ; !явоˮмна
+Pl+Pros:%>ˮ%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-28


!LEXICON  PLTRASUF
!+Pl+Tra:%>ˮңэ K ;

!! Possessor Indices
LEXICON POSSESSOR-INDICES

 POSSESSA-SINGULAR ;

LEXICON POSSESSA-SINGULAR
	POSSESSA-SG-NOM ;
	POSSESSA-SG-ACC ;
	POSSESSA-SG-GEN ;
	POSSESSA-SG-DAT ;
	POSSESSA-SG-LOC ;
	POSSESSA-SG-ABL ;
	POSSESSA-SG-PROS ;
